Hawaii statutes.
§653-8 Effect of service. (a) In case
of service upon the garnishee, the serving officer's certificate of service or,
if by mail, a copy of the return receipt shall be prima facie proof of the
service.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, service is
effective from the time when the copy is handed to, or left in the office of
the garnishee, or reaches the garnishee or the garnishee's office by mail. [L
1890, c 50, §6; RL 1925, §2851; RL 1935, §4297; RL 1945, §10328; RL 1955,
§238-8; HRS §653-8; gen ch 1985; am L 1992, c 82, §5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next